Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
39B

ALLOCATION
OF PRIVATE ACTIVITY BONDS

Section

39B-1 Definitions

39B-2 Allocation of annual state ceiling

39B-3 Application of allocation

39B-4 Report of unused allocation; reversion to
State

Revision Note

This chapter was originally assigned to chapter 39A but is renumbered
pursuant to §23G-15(1).

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next